Connecticut, session 2026, SB00303.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this
2 section:
3 (1) "Connecticut bank" has the same meaning as provided in section
4 36a‑2 of the general statutes;
5 (2) "Connecticut credit union" has the same meaning as provided in
6 section 36a‑2 of the general statutes;
7 (3) "Secured credit card" means a credit card account for which a
8 customer or member provides funds to a Connecticut bank or
9 Connecticut credit union as security for credit extended on such
10 account; and
11 (4) "Credit rating agency" has the same meaning as provided in
12 section 36a-695 of the general statutes.
SB303 / File No. 127 1

SB303 File No. 127
13 (b) Each Connecticut bank and Connecticut credit union shall make
14 available to its customers or members a secured credit card.
15 (c) Each Connecticut bank or Connecticut credit union that issues a
16 secured credit card shall make account information for such secured
17 credit card available to (1) the account holder, and (2) any third party
18 authorized by the account holder to receive such account information
19 for the purpose of furnishing or reporting such information to a credit
20 rating agency.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
BA Joint Favorable
SB303 / File No. 127 2

SB303 File No. 127
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires Connecticut banks and credit unions to make
secured credit cards, along with account information, available to
customers. The bill results in no fiscal impact to the state.
SB303 / File No. 127 3

SB303 File No. 127
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 303
AN ACT CONCERNING SECURED CREDIT CARDS.